Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.290

Licensee's failure to pay vendor, consignor—Settlement, compromise of claims—Demand on bond—Discharge.

Upon ascertaining all claims and statements in the manner herein set forth, the director may then make demand upon the bond on behalf of those claimants whose statements have been filed, and shall have the power to settle or compromise said claims with the surety company on the bond, and is empowered in such cases to execute and deliver a release and discharge of the bond involved.

[ 1959 c 107 s 29.]